Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 36
COMPACT FOR COOPERATION IN HIGHER EDUCATION

Section.

33-3601. Interstate Compact for Western Regional Cooperation in Higher Education ratified.

The State of Idaho does hereby ratify, approve, adopt and confirm the Interstate Compact for Western Regional Cooperation in Higher Education heretofore entered into between the States of Arizona, California, Colorado, Idaho, Montana, Nevada, New Mexico, Oregon, Utah, Washington, Wyoming, Alaska and Hawaii. The compact is, in words and figures as follows, except that any reference to the Territories of Alaska and Hawaii means the States of Alaska and Hawaii:

ARTICLE I

WHEREAS, the future of this Nation and of the Western States is dependent upon the quality of the education of its youth; and

WHEREAS, many of the Western States individually do not have sufficient numbers of potential students to warrant the establishment and maintenance within their borders of adequate facilities in all of the essential fields of technical, professional, and graduate training, nor do all of the States have the financial ability to furnish within their borders institutions capable of providing acceptable standards of training in all of the fields mentioned above; and

WHEREAS, it is believed that the Western States, or groups of such states within the Region, cooperatively can provide acceptable and efficient educational facilities to meet the needs of the Region and of the students thereof:

Now, therefore, the States of Arizona, California, Colorado, Idaho, Montana, Nevada, New Mexico, Oregon, Utah, Washington, and Wyoming, and the Territories of Alaska and Hawaii do hereby covenant and agree as follows:

ARTICLE II

Each of the compacting states and territories pledges to each of the other compacting states and territories faithful cooperation in carrying out all the purposes of this Compact.

ARTICLE III

The compacting states and territories hereby create the Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education, hereinafter called the Commission. Said Commission shall be a body corporate of each compacting state and territory and an agency thereof. The Commission shall have all the powers and duties set forth herein, including the power to sue and be sued, and such additional powers as may be conferred upon it by subsequent action of the respective legislatures of the compacting states and territories.

ARTICLE IV

The Commission shall consist of three resident members from each compacting state or territory. At all times one Commissioner from each compacting state or territory shall be an educator engaged in the field of higher education in the state or territory from which he is appointed.

The Commissioners from each state and territory shall be appointed by the Governor thereof as provided by law in such state or territory. Any Commissioner may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the law of the state or territory from which he shall have been appointed.
The terms of each Commissioner shall be four years; provided however that the first three Commissioners shall be appointed as follows: one for two years, one for three years, and one for four years. Each Commissioner shall hold office until his successor shall be appointed and qualified. If any office becomes vacant for any reason, the Governor shall appoint a Commissioner to fill the office for the remainder of the unexpired term.

ARTICLE V

Any business transacted at any meeting of the Commission must be by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole number of compacting states and territories.

One or more Commissioners from a majority of the compacting states and territories shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

Each compacting state and territory represented at any meeting of the Commission is entitled to one vote.

ARTICLE VI

The Commission shall elect from its number a chairman and a vice chairman, and may appoint, and at its pleasure dismiss or remove, such officers, agents, and employees as may be required to carry out the purpose of this Compact; and shall fix and determine their duties, qualifications and compensation, having due regard for the importance of the responsibilities involved.

The Commissioners shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses from the funds of the Commission.

ARTICLE VII

The Commission shall adopt a seal and by-laws and shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for its management and control.

The Commission may elect such committees as it deems necessary for the carrying out of its functions.

The Commission shall establish and maintain an office within one of the compacting states for the transaction of its business and may meet at any time, but in any event must meet at least once a year. The Chairman may call such additional meetings and upon the request of a majority of the Commissioners of three or more compacting states or territories shall call additional meetings.

The Commission shall submit a budget to the Governor of each compacting state and territory at such time and for such period as may be required.

The Commission shall, after negotiations with interested institutions, determine the cost of providing the facilities for graduate and professional education for use in its contractual agreements throughout the Region.

On or before the fifteenth day of January of each year, the Commission shall submit to the Governors and Legislatures of the compacting states and territories a report of its activities for the preceding calendar year.

ARTICLE IX

The operating costs of the Commission shall be apportioned equally among the compacting states and territories.

ARTICLE X

This Compact shall become operative and binding immediately as to those states and territories adopting it whenever five or more of the states or territories of Arizona, California, Colorado, Idaho, Montana, Nevada, New Mexico, Oregon, Utah, Washington, Wyoming, Alaska and Hawaii have duly adopted it prior to July 1, 1953. This Compact shall become effective as to any additional states or territories adopting thereafter at the time of such adoption.

ARTICLE XI

This Compact may be terminated at any time by consent of a majority of the compacting states or territories. Consent shall be manifested by passage and signature in the usual manner of legislation expressing such consent by the legislature and Governor of such terminating state. Any state or territory may at any time withdraw from this Compact by means of appropriate legislation to that end. Such withdrawal shall not become effective until two years after written notice thereof by the Governor of the withdrawing state or territory accompanied by a certified copy of the requisite legislative action is received by the Commission. Such withdrawal shall not relieve the withdrawing state or territory from its obligations hereunder accruing prior to the effective date of withdrawal. The withdrawing state or territory may rescind its action of withdrawal at any time within the two-year period. Thereafter, the withdrawing state or territory may be reinstated by application to and the approval by a majority vote of the Commission.
ARTICLE XII

If any compacting state or territory shall at any time default in the performance of any of its obligations assumed or imposed in accordance with the provisions of this Compact, all rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this Compact or agreements hereunder shall be suspended from the effective date of such default as fixed by the Commission.

Unless such default shall be remedied within a period of two years following the effective date of such default, this Compact may be terminated with respect to such defaulting state or territory by affirmative vote of three-fourths of the other member states or territories.

Any such defaulting state may be reinstated by: (a) performing all acts and obligations upon which it has heretofore defaulted, and (b) application to and the approval by a majority vote of the Commission.

33-3602. Operative date of compact.

The foregoing compact shall as to the state of Idaho become operative, and shall be in full force and effect in accordance with the provisions of Article X thereof, upon the passage and approval of this act, and the Governor shall thereafter execute the Compact by and on behalf of this state in accordance with the terms thereof.

33-3603. Appointment of Idaho members of commission.

The Governor shall thereupon appoint the Idaho members of the Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education.

The qualifications and terms of office of the members of the Commission for this state shall conform with the provisions of Article IV of the Compact as it appears in section 33-3601[, Idaho Code].

The Governor may remove a member of the Commission for cause after notice and public hearing.

33-3604. Determination of cost per student — Repayment — Cancellation of debt when practicing profession.

The Idaho members of the Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education shall annually determine the cost to the state of Idaho of each student attending any out of state institution under the provisions of this chapter.

Each student attending any institution under the provisions of this act shall, by the acceptance of the benefits of this act, become obligated to the state of Idaho for the cost to the state of Idaho for such student, as determined by the Idaho members of the Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education. Such sum or sums, together with interest thereon at the rate of five per cent (5%) per annum from the time of the expenditure by the state of Idaho shall be repaid as follows: one-fourth (¼) of said sum, together with accrued interest on or before three (3) years from the date such student completes or terminates his education and/or internship and one-fourth (¼) of such sum with accrued interest on the same date annually thereafter until said sum, together with accrued interest shall have been fully paid. In case any student shall fail to make payment in accordance with the provisions of this section, the total unpaid balance shall become immediately due and payable and shall be recovered by suit brought by the attorney-general on behalf of the state of Idaho; Provided, however, that any student who shall, within three (3) years of completion of his education, engage in the practice of his profession continuously for the period of two (2) years in the state of Idaho, shall not be obligated to repay the cost of his education or any part thereof.